Utah statutes.
35A-8-1702.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Navajo Revitalization Fund Board.

(2)  "Capital project" means an expenditure for land, improvements on the land, or equipment intended to have long-term beneficial use.

(3)  "Division" means the Housing and Community Development Division.

(4)  "Eligible entity" means:

(a)  the Navajo Nation;

(b)  a department or division of the Navajo Nation;

(c)  a Utah Navajo Chapter;

(d)  the Navajo Utah Commission;

(e)  an agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state; or

(f)  a nonprofit corporation.

(5)  "Navajo Utah Commission" means the commission created by Resolution IGRJN-134-92 of the Intergovernmental Relations Committee of the Navajo Nation Council.

(6)  "Revitalization fund" means the Navajo Revitalization Fund.

(7)  "Utah Navajo Chapter" means any of the following chapters of the Navajo Nation:

(a)  Aneth Chapter;

(b)  Dennehotso Chapter;

(c)  Mexican Water Chapter;

(d)  Navajo Mountain Chapter;

(e)  Oljato Chapter;

(f)  Red Mesa Chapter; and

(g)  Teec Nos Pos Chapter.

